California statutes. Water Code
(1) An issue of bonds is hereby defined to be the aggregate principal amount of all of the bonds authorized to be issued in accordance with a proposal submitted to and approved by the electors of the district, but no indebtedness will be deemed to have been contracted until bonds shall have been sold and delivered and then only to the extent of the principal amount of bonds so sold and delivered.

(2) The board of directors of any district issuing any bonds heretofore or hereafter authorized may, in its discretion, divide the aggregate principal amount of such issue into two or more divisions or series and fix different dates for the bonds of each separate division or series. In the event any authorized issue is divided into two or more divisions or series, the bonds of each division or series may be made payable at such time or times as may be fixed by the legislative body of the district separate and distinct from the time or times of payment of bonds of any other division or series of the same issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56089.

Bonds may be made payable on a date subsequent to the time fixed for the collection of the second installment of general district taxes with which the first levy of taxes for the payment of the principal and interest of said bonds is to be collected. In such event, the first interest coupons shall be for interest from the date of said bonds of such issue or series or division to the maturity date of said coupons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56090.

If the result of any election upon the question of the issuance of bonds is in favor of issuance, the board may, in its discretion, commence in the superior court of the county, a special proceeding to determine its right to issue the bonds and their validity, similar to the proceeding in relation to irrigation bonds, provided for by the “Irrigation District Law,” and all supplementary acts, and all their provisions apply to and govern the proceedings to be commenced by the board, so far as applicable.

The judgment has the same effect as a judgment in relation to irrigation bonds under the provisions of that act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Drainage Fees [56095. - 56095.]

56095.

In addition to all of the powers enumerated in this part, a county drainage district shall have the power to adopt by resolution and carry out any definite plan or system for accomplishing, facilitating, or financing all work which may be lawfully accomplished by a county drainage district and to enforce the plan or system by resolution. In order to carry out the plan or system, a district shall have the power, by ordinance, to prescribe, revise, and collect fees and charges for providing storm drainage facilities, including drainage outfall facilities, furnished or to be furnished to any new building, improvement, or structure constructed or to be constructed in the district; and whenever a storm drainage problem is referred to the district by any county or city located in whole or in part within the boundaries of the district, to require the installation of drainage improvements necessary or convenient for the needs of the district, including, but not limited to, residential, subdivision, commercial, and industrial drainage needs. Any county or city is hereby authorized to refer all drainage control problems arising under the Subdivision Map Act (commencing with Section 66410 of the Government Code) or otherwise to a county drainage district for solution. Revenues derived by a district under this chapter shall be used only to acquire, construct, reconstruct, maintain, and operate storm drainage facilities, including drainage outfall facilities, consistent with the plan or system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1137, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Application of Other Statutes [56100. - 56104.]

56100.

The Improvement Act of 1911 and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 are applicable to county drainage districts formed under this part. After approving and adopting the engineer’s report as provided in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56050) of this part, the district board may order the work contained in the said report to be done in whole or in part pursuant to the provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 and the costs thereof assessed upon the real property benefited, all in the manner provided by the Improvement Act of 1911 or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

56101.

In the application of those acts to proceedings under this part, the terms used in those acts shall have the following meanings:

(a) “City council” and “council” mean board.

(b) “City” and “municipality” mean district.

(c) “Clerk” and “city clerk” mean secretary.

(d) “Superintendent of streets,” “street superintendent,” and “city engineer” mean the engineer of the district, or any other person appointed to perform such duties.

(e) “Tax collector” means county tax collector.

(f) “Treasurer” and “city treasurer” mean any person or official who has charge of and makes payment of the funds of the district.

(g) “Right of way” means any parcel of land through which a right of way has been granted to the district for the purpose of constructing and maintaining a sewer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56102.

The powers and duties conferred by those acts and supplementary acts upon boards, officers, and agents of cities shall be exercised by the respective boards, officers, and agents of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56103.

No assessment or bond hereafter levied or issued shall become a lien and no person shall be deemed to have notice thereof until a certified copy of said assessment and the diagram thereto attached shall be recorded in the office of the county surveyor, if the improvement district or any part thereof is in unincorporated territory, and with the superintendent of streets of the city or cities, if the improvement district or any part thereof is in incorporated territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56104.

Notwithstanding any other provision contained in the Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 to the contrary, in the event the district board shall order the work contained in the report prepared by the district engineer pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 56050) of this part to be done in whole or in part pursuant to the provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915, the provisions of the said Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 shall not be applicable to such work if the district board so declared by resolution duly adopted by four-fifths vote after a finding that said work is necessary for the public welfare, which finding shall not be made by the district board if, prior to the conclusion of the hearing on said report as provided in Chapter 5, the owners of more than 20 percent of the total assessed value of the taxable property within the district file written protests against the doing of said work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Finance and Taxation [56110. - 56118.]

56110.

Annually, at least 15 days before the first day of the month in which the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located is required by law to levy the amount of taxes required by law for county purposes, the district board shall furnish to the board of supervisors a written statement of the amount necessary to pay the interest on bonds for that year, and the portion of the principal that is to become due before the time for making the next general tax levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56111.

The board of supervisors of the county shall annually, at the time and in the manner of levying other county taxes, levy and cause to be collected a tax upon the taxable real property in the district, based upon the last equalized assessment roll of the county sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds for that year and such portion of the principal as is to become due before the time for making the next general tax levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56112.

If the district board fails to furnish to the board of supervisors the written statement of the amount necessary, the board of supervisors of the county shall ascertain the amount necessary to pay the interest on the bonds for that year and the portion of the principal that is to become due before the time for making the next general tax levy, and shall levy and cause to be collected the necessary amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56113.

The tax shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as the general tax levy for county purposes, and when collected shall be paid into the treasury of the county to the credit of the district, and shall be used for the payment of the principal and interest upon the bonds, and for no other purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56114.

The principal and interest on the bonds shall be paid by the treasurer of the county in the manner now or hereafter provided by law for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56115.

In any year, at least 15 days before the first day of the month in which the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located, is required by law to levy the amount of taxes required by law for county purposes, the district board may furnish to the board of supervisors a written statement of the amount necessary to maintain, operate, extend, or repair any work or improvements of the district, and to defray all other expenses incidental to the exercise of any of the district’s powers, and the board of supervisors of the county shall at the time and in the manner of levying other county taxes, levy and cause to be collected a tax upon the taxable real property in the district based upon the last equalized assessment roll of the county sufficient to pay the cost of maintaining, operating, extending, or repairing any work or improvements of the district and of defraying all other expenses incidental to the exercise of any of the district’s powers. The tax authorized by this section shall not exceed twenty-five cents ($0.25) for each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value on taxable real property in any one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56116.

The tax shall be levied and collected at the same time and in the same manner as the general tax levy for county purposes, and the revenue derived from the tax shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the operating fund of the district, and the district board shall control and order its expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------

56117.

Payment from the operating fund shall be made upon claims allowed by the district board. Claims for money or damages against the district are governed by the provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided therein. Claims not governed thereby or by other statutes or by ordinances or regulations authorized by law and expressly applicable to such claims, shall be prepared and presented to the board and all claims shall be audited and paid, in the same manner and with the same effect as are similar claims against the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

56118.

The cost of preparing the engineer’s report, including the compensation paid engineers and other employees of the district, is a charge against the district and shall be paid from the first available funds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1232.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Annexation [56130. - 56130.]

56130.

Territory, whether incorporated or unincorporated, contiguous to a district, and not included in any other county drainage district or other district formed for similar purposes, may be annexed, if the additional territory will be benefited by annexation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 18. WATER REPLENISHMENT DISTRICTS [60000. - 60622.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [60000. - 60061.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title [60000. - 60000.]

60000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Water Replenishment District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [60001. - 60029.]

60001.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60002.

“Include” except when used in relation to the inclusion of land into a district does not necessarily exclude matters not enumerated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60003.

“District” means a water replenishment district formed under the provisions of the Water Replenishment District Act, or this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60004.

“Board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60005.

“Land” means land in the district or proposed district involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60006.

“President” means the president of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60007.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60008.

“General water replenishment district election” means the election required to be held in each district at the time of the general election in each even-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 7, Sec. 1.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

60009.

“Special water district election” means any district election other than a general water replenishment district election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60010.

“Elector,” “voter,” and “precinct board” have respectively the same meaning as in the Elections Code, but an “elector” or “voter” shall also be a resident of the district or proposed district involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60011.

“Person” means any public agency or public corporation, whether federal, state, or local, or any private corporation, firm, partnership, individual, or group of individuals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60012.

“Water replenishment district” means a special water replenishment district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60013.

“Water year” means the period commencing on October 1st of one calendar year and ending on September 30th of the calendar year immediately following.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60014.

“Fiscal year” means the period commencing on July 1st of one calendar year and ending on June 30th of the calendar year immediately following.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60015.

“Ground water” means nonsaline water beneath the surface of the ground, whether or not flowing through known and definite channels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

60016.

“Nonsaline water” means water which has less than 1,000 parts of chlorides to 1,000,000 parts of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

60017.

“Production” or “producing” means the extraction or extracting of ground water, by pumping or any other method, from shafts, tunnels, wells (including, but not limited to, abandoned oil wells), excavations, or other sources of such ground water, for domestic, municipal, irrigation, industrial, or other beneficial use, except that such terms shall not mean or include the extraction or extracting of ground water incidentally produced with oil in the production of oil or gas nor the extraction or extracting of ground water incidentally produced in a bona fide mining operation or in the bona fide construction of a tunnel for railroad, highway, aqueduct, pipeline, or other useful purpose (except the production of ground water for use or sale) unless the ground water so extracted shall be used or sold by the producer for domestic, municipal, irrigation, industrial, or other beneficial purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60018.

“Water-producing facility” means any device or method, mechanical or otherwise, for the production of ground water from the ground water supplies within a replenishment district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60019.

“Owner” means the person or persons owning any water-producing facility or any interest therein other than a lien to secure the payment of a debt or other obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60020.

“Operator” means the person or persons operating a water-producing facility; the owner thereof shall be conclusively presumed to be such operator unless satisfactory showing be made to the board of directors of the replenishment district that such water-producing facility actually is operated by some other person or persons. “Operator” shall mean any “person” mentioned in Section 60011 of this act who is operating a water-producing facility, it being the purpose of this act to include any such person within the provisions hereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60021.

“Producer” means any operator producing ground water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60022.

“Annual overdraft” means the amount, as determined by the board of directors of the replenishment district, by which the quantity of ground water removed by any natural or artificial means from the ground water supplies within such replenishment district during the water year exceeds the quantity of nonsaline water replaced therein by the replenishment of such ground water supplies in such water year by any natural or artificial means other than replenishment under the provisions of Part 6 of this act or by any other governmental agency or entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 585.)
-------------------------------------------

60023.

“Accumulated overdraft” means the aggregate amount, as determined from time to time by the board of directors of the replenishment district, by which the quantity of ground water removed by any natural or artificial means from the ground water supplies within such replenishment district during all preceding water years shall have exceeded the quantity of nonsaline water replaced therein by the replenishment of such ground water supplies in such water years by any natural or artificial means, the respective determination to be based upon reports, records, and other data or evidence found by such board of directors to be adequate for the purpose of making such determination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60024.

“Principal county” means the county in which the greater portion of the land in a district or a proposed district is situated, if the district or proposed district is located in more than one county. If the district is situated in only one county then “principal county” shall mean that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60025.

“Participating county” is any county other than the principal county in which the district or proposed district is situated, if the district or proposed district is located in more than one county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60026.

“Affected county” means each county in which some land of the district or proposed district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60027.

“Replenishment assessment” means any assessment levied pursuant to Part 6 (commencing with Section 60300).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 389, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

60028.

“Contaminant” means any physical, chemical, biological, or radiological substance, or substances, of a concentration which, if contained in water, will cause a significant impairment to a domestic drinking water supply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 389, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

60029.

“Existing agency” shall mean any public corporation, agency, district, or political subdivision created prior or subsequent to the formation of a replenishment district under this law and which has any of the same powers as a replenishment district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. General Provisions [60040. - 60051.]

60040.

Districts, regardless of the date of formation, are subject to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60041.

The inclusion in or annexation or addition to a replenishment district, of the corporate area of any existing agency, shall not destroy the identity or legal existence or impair the powers of any such existing agency, notwithstanding the identity of purpose, or substantial identity of purpose, of such replenishment district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60042.

Whenever by this division a notice is required to be published for a designated number of weeks or once a week for a designated number of weeks, the notice need be published on only one day of each week, and for only the same number of times as the number of weeks designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60043.

Whenever any act is required to be done or proceeding taken on or set for a particular day or day of the week in any month, the act may be done or proceeding set for and acted upon on a day of the month otherwise specified for a regular meeting of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

60044.

A district may be organized entirely within unincorporated territory, or partly within unincorporated territory and partly within incorporated territory, and within one or more counties in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60045.

No area included within any existing agency or annexations thereto, one of the purposes of which is replenishing the ground water supplies within such existing agency and which agency is empowered to levy assessments or charges upon the production of water from such ground water supplies, shall be included within any replenishment district or annexations thereto created or annexed under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60046.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60047.

The provisions of this division apply to the replenishment of ground water within all areas in this state, except those areas therein now or hereafter included within the Orange County Water District as provided by the Orange County Water District Act. The Legislature finds and declares that the problems of providing replenishment of the underground basin in the area of the Orange County Water District are peculiar to that area and for that reason it is necessary to deal specially with such area, and that this fact was recognized by the Legislature when it enacted the Orange County Water District Act and the amendments thereto to provide for such problems in that area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

60048.

No informality in any proceeding or informality in the conduct of any election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate any incorporation, annexation, exclusion, or other action under this act. Any action or proceeding wherein the validity of any such incorporation, annexation, exclusion or disincorporation is denied or questioned, shall be commenced within three (3) months from the date of the certificate of incorporation, annexation or exclusion issued by the Secretary of State, or from the date of the order of the board of supervisors declaring the disincorporation, as the case may be; otherwise, said actions and/or proceedings in respect thereto shall be held to be valid, and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60050.

If any section, subsection, subdivision, sentence, clause or phrase of this act, or of the act or acts of which this act is amendatory or supplemental, is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this act. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act, and each section, subsection, subdivision, sentence, clause and phrase thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more sections, subsections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses or phrases of the act or acts of which this act is amendatory or supplemental, be declared unconstitutional. If any section, subsection, subdivision, sentence, clause or phrase of this act for any reason be held to be unconstitutional and such unconstitutional provision shall have purported to repeal or amend any provision of the acts or acts of which this act is amendatory or supplemental, the provision existing and in force at the time of the enactment of this act shall remain and be in full force and effect notwithstanding such purported repeal or amendment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60051.

No language or provision in this division shall be interpreted or construed so as to limit, abridge or otherwise affect the water or water rights of any existing agency or person or affect the rights of existing agencies or persons with respect to any legal proceeding pending on May 1, 1955, wherein any water or water right or the protection thereof is involved; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the provisions of subdivision (7) of Section 60230 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Information by Department [60060. - 60061.]

60060.

The department shall supply information so far as it may be practicable to persons contemplating the formation of districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

60061.

Whenever the department deems it in the public interest that preliminary surveys and field investigations of a proposed district project should be made at the expense of the State, the department shall make the surveys and field investigations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [60080. - 60125.]



  CHAPTER 1. Petition for Formation [60080. - 60083.]

60080.

A petition, which may consist of any number of separate instruments, shall be filed with the county elections official of the principal county in which the proposed water replenishment district is located, signed by registered voters residing within the boundaries of the proposed district equal in number to at least 10 percent of the number of the voters residing within the proposed district; provided, that where the proposed district is situated partly in different counties, the petition must be signed by at least 10 percent of the voters of each area situated within each county, and each petition shall clearly designate in which affected county it was circulated, and each petition shall contain names only of the voters of the affected county in which the petition was circulated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 179.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60081.

Such petition shall describe the proposed boundaries of the district, recite the reasons for the proposed formation, pray that the same be organized under this act, and propose a name by which such district shall be known. The persons seeking to organize a district shall include in the petition a statement limiting the annual property tax rate, not to exceed twenty cents ($0.20) for each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation, which may be levied by the board for the purpose of purchasing water for replenishment purposes, and the board shall thereafter be limited to the rate so fixed in the petition for formation, unless a majority of the electors voting at an election held for that purpose later change the rate so fixed in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60082.

If the proposed district is situated in more than one county, the county elections official of the principal county shall immediately transmit to the county elections officials of the participating counties the petitions containing the signatures of the voters of each participating county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 180.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60083.

Within 30 days of the date of filing the petition with the county elections official of the principal county, the county elections officials of the affected counties shall examine the petition and ascertain whether or not the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters within the county. When the county elections officials of the affected counties have completed their examination of the petition, they shall each attach to the petition their certificates, properly dated, showing the results of the examination, and if from the examination they shall find that the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters residing within the boundaries of that portion of the proposed district within the affected county, or is not so signed, they shall certify the petition as sufficient or insufficient, as the case may be, and the certificates shall forthwith be transmitted to the county elections official of the principal county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 181.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Hearings on Formation [60095. - 60102.]

60095.

If the certificates of the county elections officials of each affected county as filed with the county elections official of the principal county show the petition to be sufficient, the county elections official of the principal county shall present the petition, together with the certificates of the county elections officials of the affected counties to the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 182.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60096.

Upon presentation of such petition and certificates, the board of supervisors of the principal county shall immediately file a copy of such petition with the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

60097.

Upon filing such petition with the department said department shall set the same for a public hearing within sixty (60) days, said hearing to determine whether or not other lands should be included within the proposed district, or whether some lands which are included should be excluded, and whether the proposed district, as modified by inclusions and exclusions, will be of benefit generally to all persons or property which rely directly or indirectly upon the use of or right to use the ground water supplies within such proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60098.

The department shall publish one copy of said petition, along with names of five of the persons signing such petition, together with a notice of the time, place and purpose of such hearing, and the same shall be published within each affected county pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

60099.

At said public hearing which may be adjourned from time to time, the department shall hear all evidence relevant to the inclusion of additional lands in or the exclusion of lands from the proposed district, as well as all evidence relevant to the benefits to be derived by the persons or property within said proposed district by a ground water replenishment program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60100.

In the event the department determines that additional land should be included in the proposed district, it shall forthwith set a date for a public hearing to determine whether or not such land should be included. Notice of such hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in each affected county in which the proposed land is to be included, and said notice shall contain time, place and purpose of such hearing, and shall describe the land so proposed to be included in the proposed district. In the event such hearing is held to consider the inclusion of additional land the department shall hear all evidence relevant to the inclusion of such additional land and the benefits to be derived by the persons or property within said land so to be included in the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

60101.

Within thirty (30) days after concluding all said hearings, but in any event within six (6) months of the filing of said petition with said department, the department shall make its determination of the lands to be included within the proposed district and state whether or not the persons or property within such proposed district will benefit directly or indirectly from the use or right to use the ground water supplies within such proposed district and the replenishment thereof, and this determination shall be filed with the board of supervisors of the principal county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60102.

If the department determines that the persons or property within the proposed boundaries of the district will not benefit directly or indirectly from the use of or right to use the ground water supply therein and the replenishment thereof, the board of supervisors of the principal county will take no further action, but the petition and report will be filed as a public record without prejudice to the filing of a new petition for organization of a water replenishment district, except that no such new petition shall be filed within six months after any such adverse determination by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Calling an Election [60110. - 60111.]

60110.

If the department determines that the persons or property within a proposed district will benefit directly or indirectly from the use of or right to use the ground water supplies therein or the replenishment waters thereof, the board of supervisors of the principal county shall forthwith divide the proposed district into five (5) divisions, according to and based upon the population, as estimated by the board of supervisors of the principal county from the register of voters used at the last general election, in such manner as to equalize, as nearly as practicable, the population in the respective divisions. Such divisions shall be numbered first, second, third, fourth, fifth, and one director, who shall be a resident thereof, shall be elected for each division by the voters thereof, and shall take office as hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60111.

When such order dividing the proposed district into five (5) divisions is made, said board of supervisors shall call and provide for the holding of an election to be held in said proposed district for the purpose of determining whether or not the same shall be incorporated, and for the purpose of electing the first board of directors, if the district is incorporated. The election shall be held on the next established election date not less than 74 days from the date of the adoption of the resolution or ordinance calling the election. The notice of such election shall describe the boundaries of the proposed district, as modified by the report of the department, and of the divisions thereof as so established, and shall state the proposed name of the proposed district (which name shall contain the words “____ Water Replenishment District”), and shall state that the first directors will be elected at such election, who shall take office if the district is incorporated, and shall set forth the names of the candidates of the offices of the directors from the respective divisions. The notice of election shall be published in each affected county pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. Publication shall be complete at least seven, but not more than 28, days prior to the date of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Conduct of Election [60120. - 60125.]

60120.

The provisions of the Elections Code so far as they may be applicable shall govern all general and special water district elections, except as in this act otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60121.

In such election the first directors shall be elected, and the following measure shall be submitted:
